Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.010

The council-manager plan.

Under the council-manager plan of city government, the councilmembers shall be the only elective officials. The council shall appoint an officer whose title shall be "city manager" who shall be the chief executive officer and head of the administrative branch of city or town government. The city manager shall be responsible to the council for the proper administration of all affairs of the city or town.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2019; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.010. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 2; prior: (i) 1943 c 271 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-17, part. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-21, part. (iii) 1949 c 84 s 2, part; 1943 c 271 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-26, part.]